Utah statutes.
41-1a-1012.   Destruction or change of vessel or outboard motor -- Cancellation of certificate of title.

Within 15 days after a vessel or outboard motor is scrapped, dismantled, destroyed, or changed so that it loses its character as a vessel or outboard motor, the title holder to the vessel or outboard motor shall mail or deliver the certificate of title to the division for cancellation.

